Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.220

False academic credentials—Unlawful acts—Violation of consumer protection act—Venue.

(1) It is unlawful for a person to:

(a) Grant or award a false academic credential or offer to grant or award a false academic credential in violation of this section;

(b) Represent that a credit earned or granted by the person, in violation of this section, can be applied toward a credential offered by another person; or

(c) Solicit another person to seek a credential or to earn a credit that is offered in violation of this section.

(2) The definitions in RCW 9A.60.070 apply to this section.

(3) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under chapter 19.86 RCW.

(4) In addition to any other venue authorized by law, venue for the prosecution of an offense under this section is in the county in which an element of the offense occurs.

[ 2006 c 234 s 1.]